New Jersey, session 221, A4148.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Department of 1[Education] Health1, in consultation with the Department of 1[Health] Education1, shall develop informational materials on type 1 diabetes.  The materials shall be posted on the Department of Educations Internet website.  Each school district shall make the informational materials available to the parents or guardians of the students enrolled in the districts. b. The informational materials shall include, at minimum: (1) a description of type 1 diabetes; (2) a description of risk factors and warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes; (3) a recommendation that the parents or guardians of students displaying warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes should consult with the students primary care provider to determine if immediate screening for type 1 diabetes is appropriate; (4) a description of the screening process for type 1 diabetes and the implications of test results; (5) a recommendation that, following a type 1 diagnosis, parents or guardians should consult with the students primary care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan, which may include consultation with and examination by a specialty care provider, including, but not limited to, a properly qualified endocrinologist; and (6) information on the provision of diabetes care in school following a type 1 diagnosis pursuant to P.L.2009. c.131 (C.18A:40-12.11 et seq.) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.